Utah statutes.
31A-35-501.   Emergency action regarding a license.
(1)  If the commissioner determines, based on an investigation, that the
public health, safety, or welfare requires emergency action, the commissioner
may order a summary suspension of a bail bond surety company license pending
proceedings for revocation or other action.
(2)  The order described in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  state the grounds upon which the summary suspension is issued, including
the charges made against the licensee; and
(b) advise the licensee of the right to an administrative hearing before the
commissioner within 60 days after the summary suspension is ordered.
